Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 13
MINOR POLITICAL PARTIES

1-4-1301. Formation of minor political party.

A minor political party shall adopt a constitution or set of bylaws to govern its organization and the conduct of its affairs and shall exercise thereunder any power not inconsistent with the laws of this state. The constitution or set of bylaws shall be filed with the secretary of state. Any minor political party failing to file its constitution or set of bylaws pursuant to this section shall not be qualified as a minor political party. The constitution or set of bylaws shall contain the following:

A method of nominating candidates for the partisan offices specified in section 1-4-1304 (1);

A method for calling and conducting assemblies and conventions;

A method for selecting delegates to assemblies and conventions;

A method for the selection of members and a chairperson to the state central committee and for the selection of other party officers;

A method for filling vacancies in party offices;

The powers and duties of party officers;

The structure of the state and county party organizations, if any;

A statement that any meeting to elect party officers, including delegates, and any assembly to nominate candidates, shall be held at a public place at the time specified by the party chairperson and that the time and place of such meeting shall be published once, no later than fifteen days before such meeting, in a newspaper of general circulation in each county wherein the members of the minor political party reside;

A statement that the party chairperson or his or her designee shall be the person who shall communicate on behalf of the minor political party; and

A method for amending the constitution or set of bylaws.

The chairperson of the party shall file any amendments to the constitution or set of bylaws with the secretary of state no later than fifteen days after the amendments are adopted.

The name of the minor political party shall contain no more than three words in addition to the word "party". The name of the minor political party shall not use, in whole or in part, the name of any existing political party.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire part added, p. 251, § 1, effective April 13.

L. 99:

(1)(h) and (2) amended, p. 769, § 34, effective May 20.

L. 2003:

(1)(b), (1)(c), and (1)(h) amended, p. 1311, § 9, effective April 22.

1-4-1302. Petition to qualify as a minor political party.

A petition to qualify as a minor political party must be signed by at least ten thousand registered electors and shall be submitted to the secretary of state no later than the close of business on the second Friday in the January of the election year for which the minor political party seeks to qualify.

The petition shall contain the name of the minor political party, and the heading of the petition shall state that the signers thereof desire that it be qualified as a minor political party.

Each registered elector signing a petition pursuant to this section shall print the elector's name and address, including the street and number, if any. There must be attached to each petition an affidavit of a person who is a citizen of the United States and at least eighteen years of age who circulated the petition stating:

The circulator's address;

That the circulator is a citizen of the United States and at least eighteen years of age;

That the circulator circulated the petition;

That each signature on the petition was affixed in the circulator's presence and is the signature of the person whose name it purports to be; and

That, to the best of the circulator's knowledge and belief, each of the persons signing the petition was a registered elector at the time of signing.

Upon filing, the secretary of state shall review all petition information and verify the information against the registration records. The secretary of state shall establish guidelines for verifying petition entries.

No later than twenty-one days after receipt of the petition, the secretary of state shall notify the minor political party seeking to qualify of the number of valid signatures and whether the petition appears to be sufficient or insufficient.

Repealed.

Upon determining that the petition is sufficient:

The secretary of state shall notify the minor political party and the clerk and recorder of each county that such party is qualified; and

Eligible electors shall be able to register as affiliated with such minor political party.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire part added, p. 252, § 1, effective April 13.

L. 99:

(4)(b) and (4)(c) amended, p. 769, § 35, effective May 20.

L. 2003:

(1), (2), and (4)(d)(I) amended, p. 1311, § 10, effective April 22.

L. 2011:

(1) amended, (SB 11-189), ch. 243, p. 1065, § 14, effective May 27.

L. 2021:

(1) and (3) amended and (4)(c) repealed, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1644, § 27, effective June 21.

1-4-1303. Qualifications to nominate by constitution or bylaws.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, a minor political party qualifies as a minor political party if the party satisfies the requirements of section 1-4-1302 or any one of the following conditions:

Any of its candidates for any office voted on statewide in either of the last two preceding general elections received at least five percent of the total votes cast for such office.

One thousand or more registered electors are affiliated with the minor political party prior to April 1 of the election year for which the minor political party seeks to nominate candidates.

A minor political party shall continue to be qualified as a minor political party if:

A candidate of the party for statewide office has received at least one percent of the total votes cast for any statewide office in either of the last two preceding general elections; or

One thousand or more registered electors are affiliated with the minor political party prior to April 1 in either of the last two preceding general elections for which the party seeks to nominate candidates.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 1312, § 11, effective April 22, 2003.)

Source:

L. 98:

Entire part added, p. 253, § 1, effective April 13.

L. 2003:

IP(1) and (3) amended, p. 1312, § 11, effective April 22.

L. 2019:

(1)(b) and (2)(b) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3020, § 29, effective August 2.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Colorado Votes Act") in HB 19-1278, see section 1 of chapter 326, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

1-4-1304. Nomination of candidates.

A minor political party may nominate candidates in accordance with sections 1-4-302, 1-4-402 (1)(a), 1-4-502 (1), and 1-4-802 and this article.

(1.5) (a) A minor political party may nominate candidates for offices to be filled at a general election by petition in accordance with section 1-4-802.

A minor political party may nominate candidates for offices to be filled at a general election by assembly. Except as provided in subsection (1.5)(f) of this section, an assembly shall be held no later than seventy-three days preceding the primary election.

Each candidate receiving thirty percent or more of the votes of all duly accredited assembly delegates who are present and voting on that office shall be designated by the assembly and certified pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

If an assembly designates more than one candidate for an office, or if an assembly designates one or more candidates and one or more candidates qualifies by petition, the candidate of the minor political party for that office shall be nominated at a primary election held in accordance with this code. A minor political party may prohibit unaffiliated electors from voting in the party's primary election so long as the prohibition is in accordance with the party's constitution, bylaws, or other applicable rules. Any minor party choosing to prohibit unaffiliated electors from voting in its primary election must notify the secretary of state of the prohibition not less than seventy-five days prior to the primary election.

If only one candidate is designated for an office by petition or assembly, that candidate shall be the candidate of the minor political party in the general election.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent any eligible elector associated with a political organization that does not qualify as a minor political party in an election from qualifying for the ballot by petition as an unaffiliated candidate under section 1-4-802.

Repealed.

Nominations by a minor political party, to be valid, must be made in accordance with the party's constitution or bylaws. No nomination under this section is valid for any general election unless the nominee:

Is a registered elector;

Was registered as affiliated with the minor political party that is making the nomination, as shown in the statewide voter registration system, no later than the first business day of the January immediately preceding the general election for which the person was nominated, unless otherwise provided in the constitution or bylaws of the minor political party; and

Has not been registered as a member of a major political party at any time after the first business day of the January immediately preceding the general election for which the person was nominated, unless otherwise provided in the constitution or bylaws of the minor political party.

Any minor political party nominating candidates in accordance with this part 13 shall file a certificate of designation with the designated election official no later than four days after the assembly was held at which the candidate was designated. The certificate of designation must state the name of the office for which each person is a candidate and the candidate's name and address, the date on which the assembly was held at which the candidate was designated, must designate in not more than three words the name of the minor political party that the candidate represents, and must certify that the candidate is a member of the minor political party. The candidate's name may include one nickname, if the candidate regularly uses the nickname and the nickname does not include any part of a political party name. The candidate's affiliation as shown in the statewide voter registration system is prima facie evidence of party membership.

Any person nominated in accordance with this part 13 shall file a written acceptance with the designated election official by mail, facsimile transmission, or hand delivery. The written acceptance must be postmarked or received by the designated election official no later than four business days after the filing of the certificate of designation required under subsection (3) of this section. If the acceptance is transmitted to the designated election official by facsimile transmission, the original acceptance must also be filed and postmarked no later than ten days after the filing of the certificate of designation required under subsection (3) of this section. If an acceptance is not filed within the specified time, the candidate shall be deemed to have declined the nomination.

Nothing in this part 13 shall be construed to allow a minor political party to nominate more than one candidate for any one office.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire part added, p. 254, § 1, effective April 13.

L. 99:

IP(2), (3), and (4) amended, p. 769, § 36, effective May 20; (3) amended, p. 161, § 12, effective August 4.

L. 2001:

(3) amended, p. 1002, § 7, effective August 8.

L. 2003:

(1) and (3) amended and (1.5) added, p. 1312, § 12, effective April 22.

L. 2007:

(2)(b) and (2)(c) amended, p. 1974, § 14, effective August 3.

L. 2010:

(2) amended, (HB 10-1271), ch. 324, p. 1503, § 6, effective May 27.

L. 2011:

(1.5)(b)(I) amended, (SB 11-189), ch. 243, p. 1065, § 15, effective May 27.

L. 2012:

(3) amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 681, § 18, effective May 17.

L. 2016:

IP(2), (2)(b), and (3) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 578, § 35, effective May 18.

Initiated 2016:

(1.5)(c) amended, Proposition 108, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, December 27, 2016. See L. 2017, p. 2825.

L. 2020:

(1.5)(b)(I) amended and (1.5)(f) added, (HB 20-1359), ch. 23, p. 87, § 10, effective March 16.

1-4-1305. Disqualification of minor political party.

In the event a minor political party ceases to qualify as such a party pursuant to section 1-4-1303 (2) and fails to subsequently qualify as such a party pursuant to section 1-4-1303, the secretary of state shall notify the chairperson of such party and the clerk and recorder of each county of such disqualification.

Such notice of disqualification shall be provided by the secretary of state to the chairperson of the minor political party and to each clerk and recorder no later than July 1 of an election year in which a minor political party may qualify candidates for the ballot. No certificate of designation of candidates pursuant to section 1-4-1304 (3) shall be accepted by the secretary of state from the minor political party for the election for which such party has ceased to qualify.

Upon notification of disqualification of a minor political party, each registered elector that is affiliated with such minor political party must be designated in the statewide voter registration system as "unaffiliated".

Source:

L. 98:

Entire part added, p. 255, § 1, effective April 13.

L. 2016:

(3) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 578, § 36, effective May 18.